Idaho, session 2025, H0158.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 7, Title 9, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 9-714, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
9-714. MEDIA SOURCE CONFIDENTIALITY. No person engaged in journalis-
tic activities shall be compelled to disclose in any legal proceeding, trial
before any court, or before any jury the source of any information procured
or obtained and published in a newspaper, print publication, digital news
outlet, or by a radio or television broadcasting station with which the per-
son is engaged or employed or with which the person is connected. No such
person shall be compelled to disclose unpublished information, notes, or
communications obtained or created through the course of newsgathering ac-
tivities, except as required by law in cases involving national security or
imminent physical harm.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.